Utah statutes.
31A-17-404.   Credit allowed a domestic ceding insurer against reserves for
reinsurance.
(1)  A domestic ceding insurer is allowed credit for reinsurance as either an
asset or a reduction from liability for reinsurance ceded only if the
reinsurer meets the requirements of Subsection (3), (4), (5), (6), or (7),
subject to the following:
(a)  Credit is allowed under Subsection (3), (4), or (5) only with respect to
a cession of a kind or class of business that the assuming insurer is licensed
or otherwise permitted to write or assume:
(i)  in its state of domicile; or
(ii)  in the case of a United States branch of an alien assuming insurer, in
the state through which it is entered and licensed to transact insurance or
reinsurance.
(b)  Credit is allowed under Subsection (5) or (6) only if the applicable
requirements of Subsection (8) are met.
(2)  A domestic ceding insurer is allowed credit for reinsurance ceded:
(a)  only if the reinsurance is payable in a manner consistent with Section
31A-22-1201;
(b)  only to the extent that the accounting:
(i)  is consistent with the terms of the reinsurance contract; and
(ii)  clearly reflects:
(A)  the amount and nature of risk transferred; and
(B)  liability, including contingent liability, of the ceding insurer;
(c)  only to the extent the reinsurance contract shifts insurance policy risk
from the ceding insurer to the assuming reinsurer in fact and not merely in
form; and
(d)  only if the reinsurance contract contains a provision placing on the
reinsurer the credit risk of all dealings with intermediaries regarding the
reinsurance contract.
(3)  A domestic ceding insurer is allowed a credit if the reinsurance is ceded
to an assuming insurer that is licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance
in this state.
(4) (a)  A domestic ceding insurer is allowed a credit if the reinsurance is
ceded to an assuming insurer that is accredited as a reinsurer in this state.
(b)  An insurer is accredited as a reinsurer if the insurer:
(i)  files with the commissioner evidence of the insurer's submission to this
state's jurisdiction;
(ii)  submits to the commissioner's authority to examine the insurer's books
and records;
(iii) (A)  is licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance in at least one
state; or
(B)  in the case of a United States branch of an alien assuming insurer, is
entered through and licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance in at least
one state;
(iv)  files annually with the commissioner a copy of the insurer's:
(A)  annual statement filed with the insurance department of its state of
domicile; and
(B)  most recent audited financial statement; and
(v) (A) (I)  has not had its accreditation denied by the commissioner within
90 days of the day on which the insurer submits the information required by
this Subsection (4); and
(II)  maintains a surplus with regard to policyholders in an amount not less
than $20,000,000; or
(B) (I)  has its accreditation approved by the commissioner; and
(II)  maintains a surplus with regard to policyholders in an amount less than
$20,000,000.
(c)  Credit may not be allowed a domestic ceding insurer if the assuming
insurer's accreditation is revoked by the commissioner after a notice and
hearing.
(5) (a)  A domestic ceding insurer is allowed a credit if:
(i)  the reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that is:
(A)  domiciled in a state meeting the requirements of Subsection (5)(a)(ii);
or
(B)  in the case of a United States branch of an alien assuming insurer, is
entered through a state meeting the requirements of Subsection (5)(a)(ii);
(ii)  the state described in Subsection (5)(a)(i) employs standards regarding
credit for reinsurance substantially similar to those applicable under this
section; and
(iii)  the assuming insurer or United States branch of an alien assuming
insurer:
(A)  maintains a surplus with regard to policyholders in an amount not less
than $20,000,000; and
(B)  submits to the authority of the commissioner to examine its books and
records.
(b)  The requirements of Subsections (5)(a)(i) and (ii) do not apply to
reinsurance ceded and assumed pursuant to a pooling arrangement among insurers
in the same holding company system.
(6) (a)  A domestic ceding insurer is allowed a credit if the reinsurance is
ceded to an assuming insurer that maintains a trust fund:
(i)  created in accordance with rules made by the commissioner; and
(ii)  in a qualified United States financial institution for the payment of a
valid claim of:
(A)  a United States ceding insurer of the assuming insurer;
(B)  an assign of the United States ceding insurer; and
(C)  a successor in interest to the United States ceding insurer.
(b)  To enable the commissioner to determine the sufficiency of the trust fund
described in Subsection (6)(a), the assuming insurer shall:
(i)  report annually to the commissioner information substantially the same as
that required to be reported on the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners Annual Statement form by a licensed insurer; and
(ii) (A)  submit to examination of its books and records by the commissioner;
and
(B)  pay the cost of an examination.
(c) (i)  Credit for reinsurance may not be granted under this Subsection (6)
unless the form of the trust and any amendment to the trust is approved by:
(A)  the commissioner of the state where the trust is domiciled; or
(B)  the commissioner of another state who, pursuant to the terms of the trust
instrument, accepts principal regulatory oversight of the trust.
(ii)  The form of the trust and an amendment to the trust shall be filed with
the commissioner of every state in which a ceding insurer beneficiary of the
trust is domiciled.
(iii)  The trust instrument shall provide that a contested claim is valid and
enforceable upon the final order of a court of competent jurisdiction in the
United States.
(iv)  The trust shall vest legal title to its assets in its one or more
trustees for the benefit of:
(A)  a United States ceding insurer of the assuming insurer;
(B)  an assign of the United States ceding insurer; or
(C)  a successor in interest to the United States ceding insurer.
(v)  The trust and the assuming insurer are subject to examination as
determined by the commissioner.
(vi)  The trust shall remain in effect for as long as the assuming insurer has
an outstanding obligation due under a reinsurance agreement subject to the
trust.
(vii)  No later than February 28 of each year, the trustee of the trust shall:
(A)  report to the commissioner in writing the balance of the trust;
(B)  list the trust's investments at the end of the preceding calendar year;
and
(C) (I)  certify the date of termination of the trust, if so planned; or
(II)  certify that the trust will not expire prior to the following December
31.
(d)  The following requirements apply to the following categories of assuming
insurer:
(i)  For a single assuming insurer:
(A)  the trust fund shall consist of funds in trust in an amount not less than
the assuming insurer's liabilities attributable to reinsurance ceded by United
States ceding insurers; and
(B)  the assuming insurer shall maintain a trusteed surplus of not less than
$20,000,000.
(ii)  For a group acting as assuming insurer, including incorporated and
individual unincorporated underwriters:
(A)  for reinsurance ceded under a reinsurance agreement with an inception,
amendment, or renewal date on or after August 1, 1995, the trust shall consist
of a trusteed account in an amount not less than the group's several
liabilities attributable to business ceded by the one or more United States
domiciled ceding insurers to a member of the group;
(B)  for reinsurance ceded under a reinsurance agreement with an inception
date on or before July 31, 1995, and not amended or renewed after July 31,
1995, notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, the trust shall
consist of a trusteed account in an amount not less than the group's several
insurance and reinsurance liabilities attributable to business written in the
United States;
(C)  in addition to a trust described in Subsection (6)(d)(ii)(A) or (B), the
group shall maintain in trust a trusteed surplus of which $100,000,000 is held
jointly for the benefit of the one or more United States domiciled ceding
insurers of a member of the group for all years of account;
(D)  the incorporated members of the group:
(I)  may not be engaged in a business other than underwriting as a member of
the group; and
(II)  are subject to the same level of regulation and solvency control by the
group's domiciliary regulator as are the unincorporated members; and
(E)  within 90 days after the day on which the group's financial statements
are due to be filed with the group's domiciliary regulator, the group shall
provide to the commissioner:
(I)  an annual certification by the group's domiciliary regulator of the
solvency of each underwriter member; or
(II)  if a certification is unavailable, a financial statement, prepared by an
independent public accountant, of each underwriter member of the group.
(iii)  For a group of incorporated underwriters under common administration,
the group shall:
(A)  have continuously transacted an insurance business outside the United
States for at least three years immediately preceding the day on which the
group makes application for accreditation;
(B)  maintain aggregate policyholders' surplus of at least $10,000,000,000;
(C)  maintain a trust fund in an amount not less than the group's several
liabilities attributable to business ceded by the one or more United States
domiciled ceding insurers to a member of the group pursuant to a reinsurance
contract issued in the name of the group;
(D)  in addition to complying with the other provisions of this Subsection
(6)(d)(iii), maintain a joint trusteed surplus of which $100,000,000 is held
jointly for the benefit of the one or more United States domiciled ceding
insurers of a member of the group as additional security for these
liabilities; and
(E)  within 90 days after the day on which the group's financial statements
are due to be filed with the group's domiciliary regulator, make available to
the commissioner:
(I)  an annual certification of each underwriter member's solvency by the
member's domiciliary regulator; and
(II)  a financial statement of each underwriter member of the group prepared
by an independent public accountant.
(7)  If reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer not meeting the
requirements of Subsection (3), (4), (5), or (6), a domestic ceding insurer is
allowed credit only as to the insurance of a risk located in a jurisdiction
where the reinsurance is required by applicable law or regulation of that
jurisdiction.
(8)  Reinsurance credit may not be allowed a domestic ceding insurer unless
the assuming insurer under the reinsurance contract submits to the
jurisdiction of Utah courts by:
(a) (i)  being an admitted insurer; and
(ii)  submitting to jurisdiction under Section 31A-2-309;
(b)  having irrevocably appointed the commissioner as the domestic ceding
insurer's agent for service of process in an action arising out of or in
connection with the reinsurance, which appointment is made under Section
31A-2-309; or
(c)  agreeing in the reinsurance contract:
(i)  that if the assuming insurer fails to perform its obligations under the
terms of the reinsurance contract, the assuming insurer, at the request of the
ceding insurer, shall:
(A)  submit to the jurisdiction of a court of competent jurisdiction in a
state of the United States;
(B)  comply with all requirements necessary to give the court jurisdiction;
and
(C)  abide by the final decision of the court or of an appellate court in the
event of an appeal; and
(ii)  to designate the commissioner or a specific attorney licensed to
practice law in this state as its attorney upon whom may be served lawful
process in an action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of the
ceding company.
(9)  Submitting to the jurisdiction of Utah courts under Subsection (8) does
not override a duty or right of a party under the reinsurance contract,
including a requirement that the parties arbitrate their disputes.
(10)  If an assuming insurer does not meet the requirements of Subsection (3),
(4), or (5), the credit permitted by Subsection (6) may not be allowed unless
the assuming insurer agrees in the trust instrument to the following
conditions:
(a) (i)  Notwithstanding any other provision in the trust instrument, if an
event described in Subsection (10)(a)(ii) occurs the trustee shall comply
with:
(A)  an order of the commissioner with regulatory oversight over the trust; or
(B)  an order of a court of competent jurisdiction directing the trustee to
transfer to the commissioner with regulatory oversight all of the assets of
the trust fund.
(ii)  This Subsection (10)(a) applies if:
(A)  the trust fund is inadequate because the trust contains an amount less
than the amount required by Subsection (6)(d); or
(B)  the grantor of the trust is:
(I)  declared insolvent; or
(II)  placed into receivership, rehabilitation, liquidation, or similar
proceeding under the laws of its state or country of domicile.
(b)  The assets of a trust fund described in Subsection (10)(a) shall be
distributed by and a claim shall be filed with and valued by the commissioner
with regulatory oversight in accordance with the laws of the state in which
the trust is domiciled that are applicable to the liquidation of a domestic
insurance company.
(c)  If the commissioner with regulatory oversight determines that the assets
of the trust fund, or any part of the assets, are not necessary to satisfy the
claims of the one or more United States ceding insurers of the grantor of the
trust, the assets, or a part of the assets, shall be returned by the
commissioner with regulatory oversight to the trustee for distribution in
accordance with the trust instrument.
(d)  A grantor shall waive any right otherwise available to it under United
States law that is inconsistent with this Subsection (10).
